Utah statutes.
70A-2a-503.   Modification or impairment of rights and remedies.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the lease agreement may
include rights and remedies for default in addition to or in substitution for
those provided in this chapter and may limit or alter the measure of damages
recoverable under this chapter.
(2)  Resort to a remedy provided under this chapter or in the lease agreement
is optional unless the remedy is expressly agreed to be exclusive. If
circumstances cause an exclusive or limited remedy to fail of its essential
purpose, or provision for an exclusive remedy is unconscionable, remedy may be
had as provided in this chapter.
(3)  Consequential damages may be liquidated under Section 70A-2a-504, or may
otherwise be limited, altered, or excluded unless the limitation, alteration,
or exclusion is unconscionable.  Limitation, alteration, or exclusion of
consequential damages for injury to the person in the case of consumer goods
is prima facie unconscionable, but limitation, alteration, or exclusion of
damages where the loss is commercial is not prima facie unconscionable.
(4)  Rights and remedies on default by the lessor or the lessee with respect
to any obligation or promise collateral or ancillary to the lease contract are
not impaired by this chapter.
